el: Τύπος λατέξ: Ανάμεικτο; Φυσικό; Βιολογικό; Συνθετικό; Άλλο
da: Latextype: Blandet; Naturlig; Økologisk; Syntetisk; Andet
sv: Latextyp: Blandad; Naturlig; Ekologisk; Syntetisk; Övrigt
cs: Typ latexu: Směsný; Přírodní; Organický; Syntetický; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип латекс: Смесен; Естествен; Органичен; Синтетичен; Друго
vi: Loại cao su thiên nhiên: Pha trộn; Tự nhiên; Hữu cơ; Tổng hợp; Khác
tr: Lateks tipi: Karışım; Doğal; Organik; Sentetik; Diğer
en: Latex type: Blended; Natural; Organic; Synthetic; Other
it: Tipo di lattice: Misto; Naturale; Biologico; Sintetico; Altro
ro-RO: Tip de latex: Mixt; Natural; Organic; Sintetic; Altele
es: Tipo de látex: Mezclado; Natural; Orgánico; Sintético; Otro
pl: Typ lateksu: Mieszany; Naturalny; Organiczny; Syntetyczny; Inne
hu: Latex típusa: Kevert; Természetes; Organikus; Szintetikus; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta lateksa: Mešano; Naravno; Organsko; Sintetično; Drugo
pt-BR: Látex tipo: Misto; Natural; Orgânico; Sintético; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta lateksa: Miješano; Prirodno; Organsko; Sintetičko; Ostalo
zh-CN: 乳胶类型: 混合乳胶; 天然乳胶; 有机乳胶; 合成乳胶; 其他
lt-LT: Latekso tipas: Maišytas; Natūralus; Ekologiškas; Sintetinis; Kita
nl: Latex type: Gemengd; Natuurlijk; Biologisch; Synthetisch; Overig
fi: Lateksityyppi: Sekoitettu; Luonnollinen; Luomu; Synteettinen; Muu
ko: 라텍스 유형: 혼합; 천연; 유기농; 합성; 기타
pt-PT: Tipo do látex: Misturado; Natural; Orgânico; Sintético; Outro
ru: Тип латекса: Смешанный; Натуральный; Органический; Синтетический; Другое
ja: ラテックスタイプ: ブレンド; 天然; オーガニック; 合成; その他
de: Typ des Latex: Gemischt; Natürlich; Bio; Synthetisch; Sonstige
nb: Type lateks: Blandet; Naturlig; Økologisk; Syntetisk; Annet
th: ประเภทลาเท็กซ์: ผสม; ธรรมชาติ; ออร์แกนิก; สังเคราะห์; อื่นๆ
fr: Type de latex: Mélangé; Naturel; Biologique; Synthétique; Autre
sk-SK: Typ latexu: Zmesový; Prírodný; Organický; Syntetický; Iné
zh-TW: 乳膠類型: 混合; 天然; 有機; 合成; 其他